Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,152
Refund; notice; modify or revoke; when; effect.

(1) The Tax Commissioner, after giving notice by mail to the applicant and giving an opportunity for a hearing, shall modify or revoke the refund whenever the following appears: (a) The refund was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation regarding the payment of tax on materials incorporated into the facility or facilities; or (b) the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment has modified its findings regarding the facility covered by the refund.

(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may modify its findings when it determines any of the following: (a) The refund was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation regarding the facility or planned operation of the facility; (b) the applicant has failed substantially to operate the facility for the purpose and degree of control specified in the application or an amended application; or (c) the facility covered by the refund is no longer used for the primary purpose of pollution control.

(3) On the mailing to the refund applicant of notice of the action of the Tax Commissioner modifying or revoking the refund, the refund shall cease to be in force or shall remain in force only as modified. When a refund is revoked because a refund was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation, all taxes which would have been payable if no certificate had been issued shall be immediately due and payable with the maximum interest and penalties prescribed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. No statute of limitations shall operate in the event of fraud or misrepresentation.

Laws 1972, LB 716, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 308, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 45;

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 22;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 46;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 98;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 391.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.